Florida, session 2026, HB629.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (2) through (48) of section
403.703, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as sections (3)
through (49), respectively, present subsection (35) of that
section is amended, and a new subsection (2) is added to that
section, to read:
403.703 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb629-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 629 2026
(2) "Auxiliary container" means a reusable or single-use
bag, cup, bottle, can, or other packaging that meets both of the
following requirements:
(a) Is made of cloth; paper; plastic, including, but not
limited to, foamed plastic, expanded plastic, or polystyrene;
cardboard; corrugated material; molded fiber; aluminum; glass;
postconsumer recycled material; or similar material or
substrates, including coated, laminated, or multilayer
substrates.
(b) Is designed for transporting, consuming, or protecting
merchandise, food, or beverages from or at a public food service
establishment as defined in s. 509.013(5), a food establishment
as defined in s. 500.03(1), or a retailer as defined in s.
212.02(13).
(36)(35) "Solid waste" means sludge unregulated under the
federal Clean Water Act or Clean Air Act, sludge from a waste
treatment works, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution
control facility, or garbage, rubbish, refuse, special waste, or
other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or
contained gaseous material resulting from domestic, industrial,
commercial, mining, agricultural, or governmental operations.
Recovered materials as defined in subsection (29) (28) and post-
use polymers as defined in subsection (25) (24) are not solid
waste.
Section 2. Section 403.7033, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb629-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 629 2026
to read:
403.7033 Regulation of auxiliary containers Departmental
analysis of particular recyclable materials.—The Legislature
finds that prudent regulation of recyclable materials is crucial
to the ongoing welfare of Florida's ecology and economy. As
such, the Department of Environmental Protection shall review
and update its 2010 report on retail bags analyzing the need for
new or different regulation of auxiliary containers, wrappings,
or disposable plastic bags used by consumers to carry products
from retail establishments. The updated report must include
input from state and local government agencies, stakeholders,
private businesses, and citizens and must evaluate the efficacy
and necessity of both statewide and local regulation of these
materials. To ensure consistent and effective implementation,
the department shall submit the updated report with conclusions
and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December
31, 2021. Until such time that the Legislature adopts the
recommendations of the department,
(1) Except as provided in s. 500.90, the regulation of
auxiliary containers is expressly preempted to the state. A
local government, local governmental agency, or state
governmental agency may not enact or enforce any rule,
regulation, or ordinance regarding the use, disposition, sale,
prohibition, restriction, or tax of such auxiliary containers
unless authorized by general law.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb629-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 629 2026
(2) A local government, local governmental agency, or
state governmental agency may adopt rules, regulations, or
ordinances restricting the use of glass auxiliary containers
within the boundaries of any public beach or state park within
its jurisdiction.
(3) The Division of Recreation and Parks of the Department
of Environmental Protection may adopt rules to regulate
auxiliary containers within state parks consistent with s.
258.004, wrappings, or disposable plastic bags.
Section 3. Paragraph (j) of subsection (9) of section
403.707, Florida Statutes, is amended, to read:
403.707 Permits.—
(9) The department shall establish a separate category for
solid waste management facilities that accept only construction
and demolition debris for disposal or recycling. The department
shall establish a reasonable schedule for existing facilities to
comply with this section to avoid undue hardship to such
facilities. However, a permitted solid waste disposal unit that
receives a significant amount of waste prior to the compliance
deadline established in this schedule shall not be required to
be retrofitted with liners or leachate control systems.
(j) The Legislature recognizes that recycling, waste
reduction, and resource recovery are important aspects of an
integrated solid waste management program and as such are
100 necessary to protect the public health and the environment. If
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb629-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 629 2026
101 necessary to promote such an integrated program, the county may
102 determine, after providing notice and an opportunity for a
103 hearing prior to April 30, 2008, that some or all of the
104 material described in s. 403.703(7)(b) s. 403.703(6)(b) shall be
105 excluded from the definition of "construction and demolition
106 debris" in s. 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) within the jurisdiction
107 of such county. The county may make such a determination only if
108 it finds that, prior to June 1, 2007, the county has established
109 an adequate method for the use or recycling of such wood
110 material at an existing or proposed solid waste management
111 facility that is permitted or authorized by the department on
112 June 1, 2007. The county is not required to hold a hearing if
113 the county represents that it previously has held a hearing for
114 such purpose, or if the county represents that it previously has
115 held a public meeting or hearing that authorized such method for
116 the use or recycling of trash or other nonputrescible waste
117 materials and that such materials include those materials
118 described in s. 403.703(7)(b) s. 403.703(6)(b). The county shall
119 provide written notice of its determination to the department by
120 no later than April 30, 2008; thereafter, the materials
121 described in s. 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) shall be excluded from
122 the definition of "construction and demolition debris" in s.
123 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) within the jurisdiction of such county.
124 The county may withdraw or revoke its determination at any time
125 by providing written notice to the department.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb629-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 629 2026
126 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb629-00